Alabama, session 2026rs, SB52.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a)(1) A court, upon or without motion,
shall continue a criminal case when any party thereto or his
or her leading attorney is absent from court when the case is
reached because he or she is on active duty as a member of the
National Guard or a reserve or active component of the Armed
Forces of the United States.
(2) If the leading attorney is absent, his or her
client shall make an oath that the client cannot safely go to
trial without the attorney or, if a party is absent, his or
her leading attorney shall state that the attorney cannot
safely go to trial without the party.
(3) The case may proceed if the party, in the absence
of his or her leading attorney, or the leading attorney, in
the absence of the party, announces ready for trial on the
call of the case.
(b) A court shall continue a criminal case upon a
showing by the state or the defendant that a witness is
unavailable because the witness is on active duty as a member
of the National Guard or as a member of a reserve or active
component of the Armed Forces of the United States if all of
the following are established by the movant:
(1) The witness is material and necessary.
(2) The witness is located outside of the state.
Page 2

(2) The witness is located outside of the state.
SB52 INTRODUCED
(3) The movant has submitted a request to the proper
military authority for the testimony of the witness in
accordance with any rule or directive adopted or issued by the
proper authority pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 301.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3),
in any case in which the state is granted a continuance
pursuant to subsection (a) or (b), a court shall set bail upon
application by the defendant.
(2) For any case in which the defendant is accused of
committing a violent offense as defined in Section 12-25-32,
Code of Alabama 1975, the court may set bail.
(3) This subsection does not apply to a case when the
defendant is charged with committing a capital offense under
Section 13A-5-40, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. (a)(1) A court, upon or without motion,
shall continue a civil case when any party thereto or his or
her leading attorney is absent from court when the case is
reached because he or she is on active duty as a member of the
National Guard or a reserve or active component of the Armed
Forces of the United States.
(2) If the leading attorney is absent, his or her
client shall make an oath that the client cannot safely go to
trial without the attorney or, if a party is absent, his or
her leading attorney shall state that the attorney cannot
safely go to trial without the party.
(3) The case may proceed if the party, in the absence
of his or her leading attorney, or the leading attorney, in
the absence of the party, announces ready for trial on the
Page 3

the absence of the party, announces ready for trial on the
SB52 INTRODUCED
call of the case.
(b) A court shall continue a civil case upon a showing
by a party that a witness is unavailable because the witness
is on active duty as a member of the National Guard or as a
member of a reserve or active component of the Armed Forces of
the United States if all of the following are established by
the movant:
(1) The witness is material and necessary.
(2) The witness is located outside of the state.
(3) The movant has submitted a request to the proper
military authority for the testimony of the witness in
accordance with any rule or directive adopted or issued by the
proper authority pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 301.
Section 3. It is the intent of the Legislature that,
pursuant to Section 150 of the Constitution of Alabama of
100 2022, the Supreme Court of Alabama shall amend its rules to
101 conform with this act.
102 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
103 1, 2026.
Page 4